Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 6 Public Assistance Act
40-6-27.
Supplemental Security Income.

The director of the department is hereby authorized to enter into agreements on behalf of the state with the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services or other appropriate federal officials, under the Supplemental Security Income (SSI) program established by Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., concerning the administration and determination of eligibility for SSI benefits for residents of this state, except as otherwise provided in this section. The state’s monthly share of supplementary assistance to the Supplemental Security Income program shall be as follows:

Individual living alone:$39.92

Individual living with others:$51.92

Couple living alone:$79.38

Couple living with others:$97.30

Individual living in state-licensed assisted-living residence:$332.00

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 1.]

Individual living in state-licensed supportive residential-care settings that, depending on the population served, meet the standards set by the department of human services in conjunction with the department of children, youth and families, the office of healthy aging, and/or the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals: $300.00.

Provided, however, that the department of human services shall, by regulation, reduce, effective January 1, 2009, the state’s monthly share of supplementary assistance to the Supplemental Security Income (SSI) program for each of the above-listed payment levels, by the same value as the annual federal cost of living adjustment to be published by the federal Social Security Administration in October 2008 and becoming effective on January 1, 2009, as determined under the provisions of Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.; and provided further, that it is the intent of the general assembly that the January 1, 2009, reduction in the state’s monthly share shall not cause a reduction in the combined federal and state payment level for each category of recipients in effect in the month of December 2008; provided further, that the department of human services is authorized and directed to provide for payments to recipients in accordance with the above directives.

As of July 1, 2010, state supplement payments shall not be federally administered and shall be paid directly by the department of human services to the recipient.

Individuals living in institutions shall receive a twenty-dollar ($20.00) per-month personal needs allowance from the state that shall be in addition to the personal needs allowance allowed by the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.

Individuals living in state-licensed supportive residential-care settings and assisted-living residences who are receiving SSI supplemental payments under this section shall be allowed to retain a minimum personal needs allowance of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) per month from their SSI monthly benefit prior to payment of any monthly fees in addition to any amounts established in an administrative rule promulgated by the secretary of the executive office of health and human services for persons eligible to receive Medicaid-funded long-term services and supports in the settings identified in subsection (a)(1)(v).

The department is authorized and directed to make a determination of the medical need and whether a setting provides the appropriate services for those persons who:

Have applied for or are receiving SSI, and who apply for admission to supportive residential-care settings and assisted-living residences on or after October 1, 1998; or

Who are residing in supportive residential-care settings and assisted-living residences, and who apply for or begin to receive SSI on or after October 1, 1998.

The process for determining medical need required by subsection (a)(5) of this section shall be developed by the executive office of health and human services in collaboration with the departments of that office and shall be implemented in a manner that furthers the goals of establishing a statewide coordinated long-term-care entry system as required pursuant to the Medicaid section 1115 waiver demonstration.

To assure access to high-quality, coordinated services, the executive office of health and human services is further authorized and directed to establish certification or contract standards that must be met by those state-licensed supportive residential-care settings, including adult supportive-care homes and assisted-living residences admitting or serving any persons eligible for state-funded supplementary assistance under this section. The certification or contract standards shall define:

The scope and frequency of resident assessments, the development and implementation of individualized service plans, staffing levels and qualifications, resident monitoring, service coordination, safety risk management and disclosure, and any other related areas;

The procedures for determining whether the certifications or contract standards have been met; and

The criteria and process for granting a one-time, short-term good-cause exemption from the certification or contract standards to a licensed supportive residential-care setting or assisted-living residence that provides documented evidence indicating that meeting, or failing to meet, the standards poses an undue hardship on any person eligible under this section who is a prospective or current resident.

The certification or contract standards required by this section shall be developed in collaboration by the departments, under the direction of the executive office of health and human services, so as to ensure that they comply with applicable licensure regulations either in effect or in development.

The department is authorized and directed to provide additional assistance to individuals eligible for SSI benefits for:

Moving costs or other expenses as a result of an emergency of a catastrophic nature, which is defined as a fire or natural disaster; and

Lost or stolen SSI benefit checks or proceeds of them; and

Assistance payments to SSI-eligible individuals in need because of the application of federal SSI regulations regarding estranged spouses; and the department shall provide the assistance in a form and amount that the department shall by regulation determine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 578, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 240, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 53, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 15, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 427, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 217, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 35, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 103, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 26, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 18, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 23, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 8; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 18; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

40-6-27.1.
Supplementary cash assistance program for severely disabled and elderly residents.

There is hereby established a cash assistance program for disabled and elderly legal immigrant residents of the state who received a state supplementary assistance payment under §

40-6-27

on July 1, 1997, who are in need, and who become ineligible after July 1, 1997, for federally funded assistance under the Supplemental Security Income program, Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., due solely to the restricted eligibility rules imposed by § 402(a)(1) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-193) [8 U.S.C. § 1612], and as such section may hereafter be amended.

Benefits under this program shall be provided only to residents specified in subsection (a) who are aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence or otherwise permanently residing in the United States under color of law and benefits shall not be provided to illegal or undocumented aliens.

The income and resource rules, methodologies, and limits shall be the same as those in the Supplemental Security Income program, Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.

The monthly amount of cash assistance shall be equal to the appropriate payment standard as provided in subsection (e) minus the countable income of the recipient in that month.

The department is authorized and directed to make monthly payments of cash assistance to eligible recipients in accordance with the following standards of assistance:

Institutionalized individuals, forty dollars ($40.00) per month;

All other individuals, two hundred dollars ($200) per month.

Individuals who are receiving a state supplementary assistance payment under §

40-6-27

on July 1, 1997, and who become ineligible for benefits under the Supplemental Security Income program, Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., due solely to their immigrant status shall be deemed eligible for supplementary cash assistance under this section and shall begin to receive payment in the month following the last month in which supplemental security income benefits under §

40-6-27

are received.

The department is directed to promulgate regulations to implement the supplementary cash assistance program including provisions relating to the determination of eligibility, and providing recipients with advanced, written notification of a decision to reduce or terminate benefits. Any notice of a decision to reduce or terminate benefits shall include an explanation of the reasons therefore, and the notice shall advise the recipient of a right to appeal under the administrative procedures act, §

42-35-1

et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 34, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 17.

40-6-27.2.
Supplementary cash assistance payment for certain Supplemental Security Income recipients.

There is hereby established a $206 monthly payment for disabled and elderly individuals who, on or after July 1, 2012, receive the state supplementary assistance payment for an individual in a state-licensed assisted-living residence under §

40-6-27

and further reside in an assisted-living facility that is not eligible to receive funding under Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 18, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 5, § 8; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 18; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

40-6-28.
Interim cash assistance for individuals with disabilities.

Interim cash assistance payments shall be provided to individuals determined by the director, or his or her designee, to have applied for and to have been approved for medical assistance (“Medicaid”) under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., and to have applied for and to be pursuing a claim for Supplemental Security Income benefits under Title XVI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.

Interim cash assistance payments shall continue until the recipient of the payments receives disability benefits from the Social Security Administration, or until he or she has exhausted available administrative appeals. The individual may be required to present documentation that he or she is actively pursuing his or her claim.

The department is authorized and directed to make payments of interim cash assistance to eligible recipients hereunder up to the standards of assistance established pursuant to §

40-6-3.3

[Repealed], and subject to the limits of the annual appropriation provided in subsection (f). In the event that the annual appropriation provided for in subsection (f) is not adequate for the provision of interim cash assistance payments to eligible individuals, the director is authorized to limit the amount and duration of the payments.

The department is authorized to determine income- and resource-eligibility limits for the interim cash assistance program, provided that the limits shall be no stricter than those established pursuant to §

40-6-3.1

.

The department is directed to promulgate regulations to implement the interim cash assistance program, including provisions to ensure recoupment of cash assistance by the state upon a determination of a recipient’s eligibility for SSI benefits by the Social Security Administration.

Out of the sum appropriated to the department of human services for general public assistance for the state fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, the sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), net of recoveries of disability benefits from the Social Security Administration, shall be used solely for the purposes and subject to the limitations as provided in this section, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums or such portions thereof as may be required from time to time upon receipt by him or her of duly authenticated vouchers. The director is authorized to request appropriations for subsequent state fiscal years, as he or she deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 19, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 127; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 95; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 95.

40-6-29.
Healthcare benefits — Employers — Discrimination against public assistance recipients.

No employer in the state who shall hire, contract with, or employ an individual (hereinafter “recipient”) who has been determined eligible to receive public assistance or medical assistance under chapters 6 and 5.1 and 8.4 of this title, or chapter 12.3 of title 42 and/or Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., shall discriminate against the recipient(s) on the basis that the recipient(s) receive healthcare coverage as an element of their eligibility under those chapters and act.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its regulations and any appropriate state plan(s) pursuant to the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., to provide for imposition of a fine on the failure of any employer to comply with the requirements of this section.

The amount of the fine imposed by subsection (b) of this section shall be equal to one hundred dollars ($100) for each day for each individual for which the failure occurs.

No fine shall be imposed by subsection (b) if:

The failure was due to reasonable cause and not willful neglect; and

The failure is corrected during the thirty-day (30) period (or such period as the director of the department of human services may determine appropriate) beginning on the first day any of the individuals upon whom the fine is imposed know, or exercising reasonable diligence would have known, that the failure existed. In the case of a failure due to reasonable cause and not to willful neglect, the director may waive part or all of the fine imposed by subsection (a) to the extent that the payment of the fine would be excessive relative to the failure involved.

No employer may refuse to provide employee data information lawfully requested by the department of human services about specific employees whom the department had determined eligible, or is in the process of determining eligibility, to receive public healthcare benefits.

As used in this section, the term “group health plan” has the meaning given the term in § 5000(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 5000(b)(1).

A group health plan offered by an employer:

May not take into account, for any item or services to be furnished to a recipient at the time the recipient is covered under the plan by reason of the current employment of that recipient (or the recipient’s spouse), that the recipient is entitled to healthcare coverage as an element of their eligibility; and

Shall provide that any recipient, and any recipient’s spouse and minor dependents, shall be entitled to the same benefits under the plan under the same conditions as any employee, and the spouse and dependents of the employee.

It is unlawful for an employer to offer any financial or other incentive for a recipient not to enroll (or to terminate enrollment) under a group health plan, unless the incentive is also offered to all individuals who are eligible for coverage under the plan. Any entity that violates the previous sentence is subject to a civil money penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation, which may be imposed by the department of human services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 17; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 17; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 17; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 17; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 33, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 27.